District of Columbia statutes.
47-1526

Repealed

Assessment; collection; deadline; fraudulent returns; extensions.

Repealed.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-212, § 7, 34 DCR 850
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(q)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-1526.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”